Illinois, session 104th, HB1571.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Land 5Bank Authority Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act, "land bank" 7means a public governmental entity created by one or more 8counties or municipalities in the manner set forth in this 9Act. 10    Section 10. Findings; purpose. Vacant, abandoned, and 11tax-delinquent properties negatively impact the health, 12safety, and property values of Illinois residents in 13communities across Illinois and require significant taxpayer 14expenditures to address these harmful impacts. The purpose of 15this Act is to allow Illinois municipalities, counties, and 16other taxing districts to create a land bank to facilitate the 17return of vacant, abandoned, and tax-delinquent properties to 18productive use, thereby combating community decline, 19stimulating economic growth, stabilizing neighborhoods, and 20having a positive impact on residents and the local tax base. A 21land bank created in accordance with this Act serves a public 22purpose required under Section 1 of Article VIII of the   HB1571- 2 -LRB104 06063 RTM 16096 b1Illinois Constitution.  2    Section 15. Interpretation.3    (a) This Act shall be construed liberally, and all powers 4granted in this Act shall be broadly interpreted to carry out 5the Act's intended purposes and not as a limitation of powers.6    (b) Nothing in this Act shall be interpreted to restrict 7or otherwise impose any additional limitations on the powers 8and authority already granted to municipalities and counties 9to create, establish, contract with, or operate an entity or 10agency to conduct land banking activities or other related 11activities, or to delegate certain governmental powers to a 12land bank as permitted by law.13    (c) A land bank created by a municipality or county prior 14to the enactment of this Act in the manner described in 15paragraph (3) of Section 20 shall be considered a land bank 16created under this Act on the effective date of this Act. 17    Section 20. Creation of a land bank. The corporate 18authorities of a municipality or county, or 2 or more 19municipalities or counties, may create a land bank in one or 20more of the following ways:21        (1) The corporate authorities of any home rule 22    municipality or county can create a land bank by passing 23    an ordinance.24        (2) The corporate authorities of 2 or more   HB1571- 3 -LRB104 06063 RTM 16096 b1    municipalities and counties may create a land bank by 2    entering into an intergovernmental cooperation agreement 3    pursuant to the authority granted to such municipalities 4    or counties in Section 10 of Article VII of the Illinois 5    Constitution and the Illinois Intergovernmental 6    Cooperation Act if the land bank is created by one of the 7    following combinations of counties and municipalities:8            (A) One or more counties and one or more 9        municipalities, at least one of which is a home rule 10        municipality; or11            (B) At least 3 or more municipalities, including 12        at least one home rule municipality.13        (3) The land bank is a public agency formed prior to 14    the effective date of this Act, pursuant to the authority 15    granted to municipalities, counties, or other taxing 16    districts in Section 10 of Article VII of the Illinois 17    Constitution and the Illinois Intergovernmental 18    Cooperation Act.19    Notwithstanding the manner in which the land bank was 20created, a land bank created under this Act shall itself be a 21public agency, as that term is defined in Section 2 of the 22Illinois Intergovernmental Cooperation Act, and governmental 23body politic and corporate. 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.